Washington statutes.
RCW 26.16.140

Earnings and accumulations of spouses or domestic partners living apart, minor children.

When spouses or domestic partners are living separate and apart, their respective earnings and accumulations shall be the separate property of each. The earnings and accumulations of minor children shall be the separate property of the spouse or domestic partner who has their custody or, if no custody award has been made, then the separate property of the spouse or domestic partner with whom said children are living.

[ 2008 c 6 s 613; 1972 ex.s. c 108 s 5; Code 1881 s 2413; RRS s 6896.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.